Vermont, session 2025-2026, H665.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 6 V.S.A. § 2902 is amended to read:
§ 2902. RECORDING NOTICE OF LIEN
A producer’s lien shall not continue for more than 60 days from the time
when payment became due for the last of the dairy products sold unless a
notice of the lien is filed recorded in the land records in the case of real estate
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 2 of 39
in the office of the town clerk of the town where the real estate is located and
in the case of personal property in the office of the town clerk of the town
where the handler resides, or, if the handler resides out of state, then in the
town where the personal property is located. Within ten 10 days thereafter, a
copy of the memorandum shall be filed by the producer with the Secretary of
Agriculture, Food and Markets, who may publish it as necessary to provide
notice thereof to other producers of the handler.
Sec. 2. 9 V.S.A. § 1921 is amended to read:
§ 1921. EXTENT OF LIEN; NOTICE
* * *
(b) A person who by virtue of a contract or agreement, either in writing or
parol, with an agent, contractor, or subcontractor of the owner thereof,
performs labor or furnishes materials for erecting, repairing, moving, or
altering such improvements shall have a lien, to secure the payment of the
same upon such improvements and the lot of land upon which the same stand,
by giving notice in writing to such owner or his or her owner’s agent having
charge of such property that he or she the person shall claim a lien for labor or
material. The notice shall include the date that payment is due, if known.
Such lien shall extend to the portions of the contract price remaining unpaid at
the time such notice is received.
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 3 of 39
(c) A lien herein provided for shall not continue in force for more than 180
days from the time when payment became due for the last of such labor
performed or materials furnished unless a notice of such lien is filed recorded
in the land records in the office of the town clerk as hereinafter provided.
(d) A lien under this section shall not take precedence over a deed or other
conveyance to the extent that consideration therefor has been paid in good faith
before record recording of such lien in the land records. Such lien shall not
take precedence over a mortgage given by the owner thereof upon such
building, property, or improvements and the lot of land on which the same
stand, as security for the payment of money loaned and to be used by such
owner in payment of the expenses of the same, if such mortgage is recorded in
the land records before such lien is filed in the office of the town clerk as
hereinafter provided. If such mortgagee shall receive written notice that any
lien hereunder is to be claimed, such lien shall take precedence over such
mortgage as to all advances thereafter made under such mortgage to such
mortgagor, except such advances as the mortgagee may show were actually
expended in completing such improvements to real property.
* * *
Sec. 3. 9 V.S.A. § 1923 is amended to read:
§ 1923. RECORDING NOTICE OF LIEN
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 4 of 39
A person claiming a lien under section 1921 of this title shall file submit a
written memorandum for record recording in the land records in the clerk’s
office of the town where such real estate is situated a written memorandum,
signed by him or her the person, asserting his or her the person’s claim, which
shall charge such real estate with such lien as of the visible commencement of
work or delivery of material to the extent and subject to the exceptions
provided in sections 1921 and 1922 of this title. Several such liens, asserted as
aforesaid, shall be paid pro rata, if the sum due or to become due from the
owner thereof is not sufficient to pay the same in full.
Sec. 4. 9 V.S.A. § 1971 is amended to read:
§ 1971. UNPAID WAGES; STATUTORY LIEN; PRIORITY OVER
SUBSEQUENT MORTGAGE OR LIEN
(a) A statutory lien is created on the real and personal property of a
corporation for up to 30 days of unpaid wages.
(b) The liability of a corporation to an employee for unpaid wages that
were earned for a 30-day period prior to the filing of a new mortgage or other
lien upon the property of the corporation, in all cases, shall be a first lien
thereon, notwithstanding any mortgage or other lien thereon recorded in the
land records after such wages were earned. Notice of the lien if on personal
property shall be filed with the Secretary of State and, if on real property,
recorded in the land records in the office of the town clerk of the town where
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 5 of 39
the real property is located, by the employee or the Department of Labor acting
on behalf of one or more employees. An employee who is owed wages or the
Department of Labor acting on behalf of one or more employees may file an
action to execute on the lien in the Civil Division of the Superior Court in the
county in which the corporation has its principal place of business in the State,
or in the Civil Division of the Washington County Superior Court.
Sec. 5. 9 V.S.A. § 2051 is amended to read:
§ 2051. FILING RECORDING IN TOWN CLERK’S OFFICE
Notices of liens upon real or personal property for taxes or other obligations
payable to the United States of America, certificates and notices affecting the
liens, and certificates discharging the liens shall be filed recorded in the land
records in the office of the town clerk of the town in this State within which
the property subject to the lien is situated.
Sec. 6. 9 V.S.A. § 2052 is amended to read:
§ 2052. RECORDING OF NOTICE OF LIEN
When a notice of a federal lien is filed recorded in the land records, the
town clerk shall forthwith record index the same in alphabetical order in a
book kept for that purpose the general index with the date and hour of filing
recording the lien. A town clerk shall keep on file in the clerk’s office the
notices of these liens. Liens filed under this section shall be indexed in
accordance with 24 V.S.A. § 1153 or 1161.
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 6 of 39
Sec. 7. 9 V.S.A. § 2053 is amended to read:
§ 2053. DISCHARGE OF LIEN
When a certificate of discharge of a federal lien is filed recorded in the land
records in the office of the town clerk, the town clerk shall enter index the
same, with the date of filing recording, upon the same page of the record where
the notice of the lien is filed recorded and indexed, and permanently attach the
original certificate of discharge to the original notice of the lien.
Sec. 8. 10 V.S.A. § 865 is amended to read:
§ 865. COPY OF AWARD AND JUDGMENT FILED RECORDED AND
INDEXED
A certified copy of the award of the selectboard or of the report of the
commissioners, finally accepted by the Superior Court, with the orders and
judgments of such the court, shall be recorded in the land records and indexed
in the general index in the office of the town clerk where the lands are situated.
Sec. 9. 12 V.S.A. § 2783 is amended to read:
§ 2783. OFFICER MAY LODGE COPY IN CLERK’S OFFICE
When the officer holding an execution for collection is directed by the
creditor, his or her or the creditor’s agent or attorney, to levy the same on the
real estate of the debtor, he or she the officer may lodge in submit for
recording in the land records with the office where by law a deed of such real
estate is required to be recorded, a certified copy of the execution, with a
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 7 of 39
certificate thereon, under his or her the officer’s hand, stating that he or she the
officer is directed to levy the same on such real estate, designating the same as
it would be described in case of the attachment of real estate.
Sec. 10. 12 V.S.A. § 2800 is amended to read:
§ 2800. CERTIFICATE OF REDEMPTION
When the debtor redeems the premises, the clerk or magistrate shall give
him or her the debtor a certificate of such redemption, at his or her the debtor’s
expense, which, if recorded on the margin of the record of such sale in the land
records, shall be full evidence that such land has been redeemed. The clerk or
magistrate shall indicate on the record of the levy of execution where the
certificate of redemption is recorded and indexed.
Sec. 11. 12 V.S.A. § 2802 is amended to read:
§ 2802. OFFICER TO LODGE COPY IN CLERK’S OFFICE; NOTICE TO
TENANT
The officer levying an execution on the rents, issues, and profits mentioned
in section 2801 of this title shall lodge in record with the office where by law a
deed of the real estate yielding or paying such rents, issues, and profits is
required to be recorded and indexed, a certified copy of the execution, stating
that he or she the officer is directed to levy the same on the rents, issues, and
profits of the real estate, and designating such real estate as in attachment.
Within ten 10 days thereafter, he or she the officer shall serve a written notice
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 8 of 39
of such levy upon the tenant in possession of the described real estate, by
delivering the same to him or her the tenant personally or leaving it at his or
her the tenant’s last and usual place of abode.
Sec. 12. 12 V.S.A. § 2902 is amended to read:
§ 2902. RELATION TO OTHER REMEDIES
The lien created by this chapter shall be in addition to and separate from
any other remedy or interest created by law or contract. Any judgment lien
filed recorded in the land records on real property which that has been attached
in the suit in which the judgment is rendered shall relate back to the date of
attachment if the judgment is recorded in the land records within 60 days after
it becomes final.
Sec. 13. 12 V.S.A. § 2903 is amended to read:
§ 2903. DURATION AND EFFECTIVENESS
(a) A judgment lien shall be effective for eight years from the issuance of a
final judgment on which it is based except that an action to foreclose the
judgment lien during the eight-year period shall extend the period until the
termination of the foreclosure suit if a copy of the complaint is filed recorded
in the land records on or before eight years from the issuance of the final
judgment.
(b) A judgment that is renewed or revived pursuant to section 506 of this
title shall constitute a lien on real property for eight years from the issuance of
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 9 of 39
the renewed or revived judgment if recorded in the land records in accordance
with this chapter. The renewed or revived judgment shall relate back to the
date on which the original lien was first recorded if a copy of the complaint to
renew the judgment was recorded in the land records where the property lies
within eight years after the rendition of the judgment, and the renewed or
revived judgment is subsequently recorded in the land records in accordance
with this chapter.
* * *
(d) If a judgment lien is not satisfied within 30 days of after recording in
the land records, it may be foreclosed and redeemed as provided in this title
and V.R.C.P. 80.1. Unless the court finds that as of the date of foreclosure the
amount of the outstanding debt exceeds the value of the real property being
foreclosed, chapter 172 of this title shall apply to foreclosure of a judgment
lien.
Sec. 14. 12 V.S.A. § 2904 is amended to read:
§ 2904. RECORDING
A judgment creditor may record a judgment lien at any time within eight
years from the date the judgment becomes final in the town clerk’s office of
any town where real property of the debtor is located. Recording shall consist
of filing submitting a copy of the judgment with date when it became final,
certified by the clerk of the court issuing the judgment. The certification shall
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 10 of 39
be recorded by the town clerk in the land records and indexed in the general
index.
Sec. 15. 12 V.S.A. § 3292 is amended to read:
§ 3292. RECORDING BY TOWN OR SUPERIOR CLERK
When a copy of a writ of attachment, on which real estate is attached, is
lodged in submitted to the office of a town or Superior clerk, such clerk shall
enter in a book to be kept for that purpose record in the land records and index
in the general index the names of the parties, the date of the writ, the time
when and the court to which the same is returnable, the nature of the action, the
sum demanded, and the officer’s return thereon.
Sec. 16. 12 V.S.A. § 3293 is amended to read:
§ 3293. DISCHARGE OF ATTACHMENT LIEN
(a) When an attachment or sequestration of real estate is made in an action
at law, such real estate shall be discharged from such attachment lien and the
party in whose favor the attachment or sequestration is made, his or her or the
party’s legal representative or attorney of record in the action shall discharge
such attachment upon the record of attachment by recording a certificate of
discharge in the land records in a form similar to a mortgage discharge separate
from mortgage in the town clerk’s office, under any one of the following
conditions:
* * *
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 11 of 39
(b) If such attachment or sequestration is not discharged of record as above
provided, any person having any title in or lien on such property may obtain
from the court to which the original writ or process was made returnable, a
certificate stating therein the fulfillment of any one of the conditions set forth
above, and may file submit such certificate in the town or city clerk’s office in
the town or city where such attachment was made. Such clerk shall thereupon
discharge such attachment as follows:
“Discharged by the town (city) clerk per court’s certificate on file.”
* * *
Sec. 17. 12 V.S.A. § 4932 is amended to read:
§ 4932. VENUE; JOINDER OF PARTIES; RECORDING
* * *
(b) The plaintiff shall file submit a copy of the complaint in the town
clerk’s office in each town where the mortgaged property is located. The clerk
of the town shall minute on the margin of the record of the mortgage that
record in the land records and index in the general index a copy of foreclosure
proceedings on the mortgage is filed. The filing recording shall be sufficient
notice of the pendency of the action to all persons who acquire any interest or
lien on the mortgaged premises between the dates of filing recording the copy
of foreclosure and the recording of the final judgment in the proceedings.
Without further notice or service, those persons shall be bound by the
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 12 of 39
judgment entered in the cause and be foreclosed from all rights or equity in the
premises as completely as though they had been parties in the original action.
* * *
Sec. 18. 12 V.S.A. § 4934 is amended to read:
§ 4934. SUPPLEMENTAL JUDGMENT JOINING PARTIES; RECORDING
At any time, without further notice or service on the purchaser or mortgagor
or lienholder whose interest in the property being foreclosed first arose after
the filing recording of the complaint in the land records in the town clerk’s
office, and upon filing certified copies of the deed, mortgage, or attachment
with the clerk of the court by the plaintiff in the foreclosure action, any
Superior judge may sign a supplemental judgment specifically naming that
party. Reference to the deed, mortgage, or lien and the supplemental judgment
may be filed recorded in the town clerk’s office for record recording in the
land records, and it shall have the same force and effect as though that person
had been made a party defendant in the original action.
Sec. 19. 15 V.S.A. § 291 is amended to read:
§ 291. WHEN A MARRIED PERSON DESERTS OR FAILS TO SUPPORT
HIS OR HER A SPOUSE
* * *
(f) When filed and recorded in the land records in the office of the clerk of
a town, or served upon a private corporation, such order shall be a lien upon
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 13 of 39
such of the real estate and personal property of the defendant in such town, and
upon the stock of the defendant in such corporation as is mentioned in the
order.
* * *
Sec. 20. 19 V.S.A. § 757 is amended to read:
§ 757. FILING RECORDING AND INDEXING OF SURVEY AND
APPRAISAL
The commissioners shall also file record and index a copy of the survey and
the appraisal of damages in the land records and general index in the town
clerk’s office at the time of filing their report in the Superior Court.
Sec. 21. 21 V.S.A. § 1336 is amended to read:
§ 1336. LIEN; FEE; FORECLOSURE
(a)(1) All contributions, interest, penalties, and costs thereon due and
payable by an employer under the provisions of this chapter shall be a lien
upon the real estate of the employer from the date a lien for the contributions,
interest, penalties, and costs is entered recorded in the land records of the town
in which is located the real estate of the employer is located.
* * *
Sec. 22. 24 V.S.A. § 1061 is amended to read:
§ 1061. CONVEYANCE OF REAL ESTATE
* * *
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 14 of 39
(d) Subject to the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, real
estate owned by a city, town, village, or town school district may be conveyed
by an agent designated by the legislative body for that purpose, and the
conveyance shall be under the hand and seal of the agent. The legislative body
shall certify the designation of an agent and have the certificate recorded in the
land records and indexed in the general index by the clerk of the city, town,
village, or town school district.
* * *
Sec. 23. 24 V.S.A. chapter 35 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 35. TOWN CLERKS
* * *
§ 1154. RECORDS; COPIES
(a) A town clerk shall record in the land records, at length or by accurate,
legible copy, in books to be furnished by the town:
* * *
(9) other instruments delivered to the town clerk for recording in the
land records.
(b) A temporary permit (if defined by the bylaws of the municipality) is not
required to be recorded in the land records.
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 15 of 39
(c) A notice of a municipal land use permit or a notice of violation
specified in subdivision (a)(6) of this section may be recorded in the land
records, and if such the notice is recorded, it shall list:
* * *
(4) whether an appeal of such the permit, certificate, or notice has been
taken;
* * *
§ 1154a. RECORDS; RETURN POSTAGE
Whenever an instrument listed in section 1154 of this chapter is filed or left
for record with submitted to the town clerk for recording in the land records,
the town shall bear the costs of returning the original copy of the instrument to
the person who filed or left submitted the instrument for record recording.
§ 1155. RECORD OF TRUST MORTGAGE
Trust mortgages may be recorded in the land records by furnishing the town
clerk with a printed copy thereof of the trust mortgage on not smaller than 8
1/4 by 10 3/4 nor larger than 10 1/2 by 16 ledger paper of good quality with
good cloth binding which volume after being duly compared with the original
mortgage shall be filed, attested by him or her and kept in his or her office as a
trust mortgage record recorded in the land records. The clerk shall also certify
on a blank page of the then current mortgage record book the recording of such
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 16 of 39
the trust mortgage under the provisions of this section and index the same as
provided in section 1154 of this title.
§ 1156. CHATTEL MORTGAGES; CONDITIONAL SALES; DISCHARGE
OF LIEN
Within 15 days after a chattel mortgage, a sufficient memorandum of a
conditional vendor’s lien, or a memorandum of a discharge of such the
mortgage or lien has been delivered submitted to a town clerk for recording in
the land records, accompanied by the recording fee provided in 32 V.S.A.
§ 1671, such the clerk shall record such the mortgage, lien, or discharge and
return the original to the person entitled thereto to the original copy.
§ 1157. DUTIES OF TOWN CLERK AS TO CHATTEL MORTGAGES
A town clerk shall procure and keep a book of records for mortgages of
personal property and shall keep an alphabetical index of mortgagors and
mortgagees. The record and index shall be open to public inspection. The
clerk shall record in the book any mortgage, transfer, discharge, or officer’s
return of sale upon any mortgage. Reference to the volume and page of the
record of the mortgage shall be made by the clerk upon the margin of the
record of the return, as well as reference on the margin of the record of the
mortgage to the volume and page of the record of the return. When requested,
the clerk shall give a certified copy thereof of the records on payment of his or
her fees as provided in 32 V.S.A. § 1671 and shall certify the time when the
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 17 of 39
same is received and recorded. Mortgages or deeds of trust conveying both
real and personal property shall be recorded only as real estate mortgages, but
town clerks shall include in their indices of mortgages of personal property a
reference to the record thereof of the mortgage of personal property. A copy of
the personal mortgage, certified as a true and correct copy by the recording
clerk, may be pasted or otherwise permanently attached in the record books,
provided that space on the back of the sheet to be pasted is allowed for pasting,
and when so done the same shall be deemed to be legally recorded, or if a
person leaving the mortgage for record so desires, it shall be copied into the
records at length by the town clerk.
§ 1158. ASSIGNMENT OR DISCHARGE OF MORTGAGE OR
JUDGMENT LIEN
An assignment or discharge of a mortgage or judgment lien shall be duly
recorded in the land records of the town. A mortgage or judgment lien may be
discharged by the mortgagee, judgment creditor, or assignee of such the
mortgage or judgment lien in writing on the margin of the mortgage record or
judgment lien notice. A satisfaction or assignment of the mortgage or
judgment lien recorded elsewhere shall bear a marginal notation of the book
and page of the mortgage or judgment lien record and a corresponding cross-
reference shall be made on the margin of the mortgage or judgment lien notice
record.
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 18 of 39
§ 1159. INDORSEMENT OF TIME OF RECEIVING INSTRUMENTS
* * *
(b) Within three days following the date an instrument is indorsed, the
clerk shall enter index the name or names of the parties, the type of instrument,
the date of the instrument, and the date and time of recording in a day book,
printed index, or digital index that is open to public inspection. A town clerk
may extend the time for entering indexing the information for good cause
shown, including reasons related to illness or absence of the clerk.
* * *
§ 1161. GENERAL INDEX
(a)(1) A town clerk shall keep a general index of transactions affecting the
title to real estate wherein he or she within which the clerk shall enter index in
one column, in alphabetical order, the name of the grantor to the grantee and,
in a parallel column, the name of the grantee from the grantor, of every deed,
conveyance, mortgage, lease, or other instrument affecting the title to real
estate, and each writ of attachment, notice of lien, or other instrument
evidencing or giving notice of an encumbrance on real estate which is filed or
recorded in the town clerk’s office, with the name of the book, volume, or
other manner of recording and the page of record in the following form:
* * *
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 19 of 39
(b) For the purposes of this section, “transactions affecting title to real
estate” shall include includes the instruments described in subsections 1154(a)
and (b) of this title. Each owner of record title to the property at the time such
an instrument is issued shall be listed as the grantor. The State of Vermont
shall be listed as the grantee for instruments described in subdivisions
1154(a)(4), (5), and (8) of this title. The municipality issuing the instrument
shall be listed as the grantee for instruments described in subdivision
1154(a)(6) of this title.
* * *
Sec. 24. 24 V.S.A. § 1461 is amended to read:
§ 1461. LOCATION OR ALTERATION OF MUNICIPAL LINES;
MONUMENTS
(a) When the legislative bodies of adjoining municipalities are able to agree
as to the location of a municipal line, each legislative body shall vote in
meetings duly warned for the purpose to adopt the location. Prior to the vote,
each legislative body shall hold at least one public hearing duly warned for the
purpose of informing the public of, and allowing public comment on, the
location of the line. Following the meetings, the legislative bodies shall
conduct a, or ratify an existing, survey of the municipal line and file certified
copies of the minutes of the meetings, and the survey, and a list of property
owners, the legal location of whose property is changed by the agreement, with
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 20 of 39
the Secretary of State, the clerk of each of the municipalities, and the Vermont
Enhanced 911 Board.
(b) When the legislative bodies of adjoining municipalities are unable to
agree as to the location of a municipal line, or in the absence of a clearly
definable charter line, the legislative bodies shall sign a written agreement to
submit to arbitration pursuant to 12 V.S.A. chapter 192.
* * *
(2) If an award of arbitration would result in an alteration of a municipal
line, the award shall require that a survey be conducted of the municipal line
and apportion the cost of the survey between or among the respective
municipalities as deemed appropriate. Following the survey, one or more of
the legislative bodies shall petition the General Assembly to adopt the
alteration of the municipal line pursuant to the survey. Following enactment of
legislation which alters a municipal line, the legislative bodies shall:
(A) file the survey and a list of property owners, the legal location of
whose property is changed by the award, with the Secretary of State, the clerk
of each of the municipalities, and the Vermont Enhanced 911 Board; and
(B) submit the survey and a list of property owners in each affected
municipality, the legal location of whose property is changed by the award, to
the town clerk for recording in the land records.
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 21 of 39
(3) Each legislative body of the adjoining municipalities shall post a
notice of the petition to the General Assembly that specifies the nature and
extent of the proposed legislation in at least two public places and in the town
clerk’s office at least three weeks prior to filing the petition.
(c) When the legislative bodies of adjoining municipalities are able to agree
as to the location of a municipal line and one or more of the legislative bodies
believes that alteration of the existing line or the establishment of a new line is
necessary, the legislative bodies shall conduct a survey of the new municipal
line.
(1) Following the completion of the survey, one or more of these
legislative bodies shall petition the General Assembly to establish the location
of the municipal line. Following the enactment of legislation which that
ratifies the alteration of the municipal line, the legislative bodies shall:
(A) file the survey and a list of property owners, the legal location of
whose property is changed by the legislation, with the Secretary of State, the
clerk of each of the municipalities, and the Vermont Enhanced 911 Board; and
(B) submit the survey and a list of property owners in each affected
municipality, the legal location of whose property is changed by the award, to
the town clerk for recording in the land records.
(2) Each legislative body of the adjoining municipalities shall post a
notice of the petition to the General Assembly that specifies the nature and
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 22 of 39
extent of the proposed legislation in at least two public places and in the town
clerk’s office at least three weeks prior to filing the petition.
* * *
(g) Upon receipt of a list of property owners filed pursuant to subsection
(a), (b), or (c) of this section, a municipal clerk shall file record the list in the
land records of the municipality and shall place index in the grantee index of
those records the names of property owners whose land or portion thereof of
land has been added to the municipality and in the grantor index of those
records the names of property owners whose land or portion thereof of land has
been subtracted from the municipality.
Sec. 25. 24 V.S.A. § 1981 is amended to read:
§ 1981. ENFORCEMENT OF ORDER FROM JUDICIAL BUREAU
* * *
(b) In addition to any other civil remedies available by law, a final
judgment of the Judicial Bureau that has not been satisfied within 30 days
shall, upon due recordation recording in the land records of the town in which
any real or personal property of the defendant is located, constitute a lien upon
that real or personal property, except for motor vehicles as defined by 23
V.S.A. § 4(21), and may be enforced within the time and in the manner
provided for the collection of taxes pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 133,
subchapter 8.
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 23 of 39
* * *
Sec. 26. 24 V.S.A. § 3262 is amended to read:
§ 3262. WRITTEN AGREEMENTS; CONSENT OF PROPERTY OWNERS;
ENERGY SAVINGS ANALYSIS
* * *
(d) A written agreement or notice of such the agreement and the analysis
performed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall be filed with
submitted to the clerk of the applicable municipality for recording in the land
records of that municipality and shall be disclosed to potential buyers prior to
transfer of property ownership. Personal financial information provided to a
municipality by a participating property owner or potential participating
property owner shall not be subject to disclosure as set forth in 1 V.S.A.
§ 317(c)(7). If a notice of agreement is filed instead of the full written
agreement, the notice shall attach the analysis performed pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section and shall include at least each of the following:
* * *
Sec. 27. 24 V.S.A. § 3268 is amended to read:
§ 3268. RELEASE OF LIEN
* * *
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 24 of 39
(b) Notice of a release of a lien for an assessment under this subchapter
shall be filed with submitted to the clerk of the applicable municipality for
recording in the land records of that municipality.
Sec. 28. 24 V.S.A. § 4423 is amended to read:
§ 4423. TRANSFER OF DEVELOPMENT RIGHTS
* * *
(c) The municipality shall maintain a map of areas from which
development rights have been severed. Following issuance of a zoning permit
under this section, the municipality shall effect all the following:
(1) Ensure that the instruments transferring the conservation easements
and the development rights are recorded in the land records.
* * *
(d) Failure to record an instrument in the land records or mark a map does
not invalidate a transfer of development rights. Development rights transferred
under this section shall be valid notwithstanding any subsequent failure to file
a notice of claim under the Marketable Record Title Act.
Sec. 29. 24 V.S.A. § 4449 is amended to read:
§ 4449. ZONING PERMIT, CERTIFICATE OF OCCUPANCY, AND
MUNICIPAL LAND USE PERMIT
* * *
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 25 of 39
(c)(1) Within 30 days after a municipal land use permit has been issued or
within 30 days of the issuance of any notice of violation, the appropriate
municipal official shall:
(A) deliver the original or a legible copy of the municipal land use
permit or notice of violation or a notice of municipal land use permit generally
in the form set forth in subsection 1154(c) of this title to the town clerk for
recording in the land records as provided in subsection 1154(a) of this title; and
* * *
Sec. 30. 27 V.S.A. § 307 is amended to read:
§ 307. VENDOR’S LIENS
The vendor of real estate shall not have a lien thereon for unpaid purchase
money, except such lien as is created and evidenced by deed executed,
acknowledged, and recorded in the land records as deeds of conveyance of real
estate.
Sec. 31. 27 V.S.A. § 308 is amended to read:
§ 308. MINES AND QUARRIES
The grantee of a mine, quarry, or of the right of mining and quarrying, in
severance from the ownership of the soil, within 30 days after its execution,
shall cause his or her the grantee’s deed, lease, or other instrument to be
recorded in a book kept for that purpose in the office where by law the land
records in the same manner as a deed of the real estate is required to be
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 26 of 39
recorded. A grantee failing to comply with the foregoing provision shall
forfeit to the town, or in case such a mine, quarry, or right of mining or
quarrying is situated in an unorganized town or gore, to the county, $50.00, to
be recovered in an action on this statute.
Sec. 32. 27 V.S.A. § 341 is amended to read:
§ 341. REQUIREMENTS GENERALLY; RECORDING
(a) Deeds and other conveyances of lands, or of an estate or interest in land,
shall be signed by the party granting the same and acknowledged by the
grantor before a notary public and recorded at length in the land records in the
clerk’s office of the town in which the lands lie. The acknowledgment before a
notary public shall be valid without an official stamp being affixed to the
notary’s signature.
(b)(1) A deed or other conveyance of land that includes a reference to a
survey prepared or revised after July 1, 1988, may be recorded in the land
records only if it is accompanied by the survey to which it refers, or cites the
volume and page in the land records showing where the survey has previously
been recorded.
* * *
Sec. 33. 27 V.S.A. § 342 is amended to read:
§ 342. ACKNOWLEDGMENT AND RECORDING REQUIRED
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 27 of 39
A deed of bargain and sale, a mortgage or other conveyance of land in fee
simple or for term of life, or a lease for more than one year from the making
thereof shall not be effectual to hold such lands against any person but the
grantor and his or her the grantor’s heirs, unless the deed or other conveyance
is acknowledged and recorded in the land records.
Sec. 34. 27 V.S.A. § 350 is amended to read:
§ 350. CHANGE IN NAME OR STATUS OF OWNER OF REAL ESTATE
Any person or corporation owning real estate or having an interest in real
estate whose name has been changed, and any corporation that has been
merged into or consolidated with another, may file with submit to the town
clerk of the town in which the real estate is located a certificate giving the
names before and after the change, merger, or consolidation, and the town
clerk shall record in the land records and index in the general index the
certificate in the land records.
Sec. 35. 27 V.S.A. § 405 is amended to read:
§ 405. VENDOR TO RECORD TITLE ON REQUEST
When a person sells and conveys lands, or an estate or interest in land, the
person shall cause the person’s title deed to be recorded in the land records of
the town clerk’s office of the town in which the property is situated within six
months after request made in writing by a subsequent purchaser of the same
lands or an estate or interest in the lands.
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 28 of 39
Sec. 36. 27 V.S.A. § 408 is amended to read:
§ 408. RECORDING SUBORDINATION OF LIENS
An agreement for the subordination of a prior lien or other encumbrance on
real property shall be recorded in the land records of the town in which the
property is situated, and a reference to the record of the subordination
agreement shall be noted on the margin of the record of the instrument affected
by the agreement. If not so recorded, the agreement shall bind only the parties
to the agreement.
Sec. 37. 27 V.S.A. § 410 is amended to read:
§ 410. LIEN PRIORITIES
* * *
(b) Lien priorities; future advances.
* * *
(4) A future advance made to protect collateral takes priority as of the
date a mortgage is recorded in the land records, even though the mortgagee has
received written notice of an intervening interest at the time the future advance
is made.
* * *
Sec. 38. 27 V.S.A. § 461 is amended to read:
§ 461. BY ENTRY ON RECORD
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 29 of 39
Mortgages may be discharged by an entry on the margin of the record
thereof in the record of deeds recording in the land records of the town in
which the property is situated, acknowledging satisfaction of the mortgage,
signed by the mortgagee or by his or her the mortgagee’s executor,
administrator, assignee, attorney at law, or attorney acting under a duly
executed and recorded power of attorney, such signature to be witnessed by the
town clerk or assistant town clerk having custody of such record. Such entry
shall have the same effect as a deed of release acknowledged and recorded.
Sec. 39. 27 V.S.A. § 462 is amended to read:
§ 462. BY ACKNOWLEDGMENT OF PAYMENT
Mortgages may also be discharged by the mortgagee or by his or her the
mortgagee’s executor, administrator, assignee, attorney at law, or attorney
acting under a duly executed and recorded power of attorney, acknowledging
payment thereof by an entry on the mortgage deed, signing the same in the
presence of one or more witnesses, which entry, upon being recorded on the
margin of the record of such mortgage in the record of deeds in the land
records of the town in which the property in situated, shall discharge such
mortgage and bar all actions brought thereon.
Sec. 40. 27 V.S.A. § 463 is amended to read:
§ 463. BY SEPARATE INSTRUMENT
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 30 of 39
(a) Mortgages may be discharged by an acknowledgment of satisfaction,
executed by the mortgagee or his or her the mortgagee’s attorney, executor,
administrator, or assigns, which shall be substantially in the following form:
I hereby certify that the following described mortgage is paid in full and
satisfied, viz: ______________ mortgagor to ______________ mortgagee,
dated ______________ 20____, and recorded in book ______, page ______,
of the land records of the town of __________________________________.
(b) When such satisfaction is acknowledged before a notary public and
recorded in the land records, it shall discharge such mortgage and bar actions
brought thereon.
Sec. 41. 27A V.S.A. § 2-104 is amended to read:
§ 2-104. DESCRIPTION OF UNITS
A description of a unit that sets forth the name of the common interest
community, the volume and page in which the declaration is recorded in the
land records, the town in which the common interest community is located,
and the identifying number of the unit is a legally sufficient description of that
unit and all rights, obligations, and interests appurtenant to that unit that were
created by the declaration or bylaws.
Sec. 42. 29 V.S.A. § 563 is amended to read:
§ 563. ABANDONMENT OF OIL AND GAS INTERESTS;
PRESERVATION
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 31 of 39
* * *
(f) The owner of an interest in oil or gas may file record a statement of
interest in the land records of any municipality in which the land affected is
located. The statement shall include a description of the land affected, the
nature of the interest claimed, the book and page of recording of the original
grant of the interest, and the name and address of the person claiming the
interest.
(g) The owner of the surface estate from which an oil and gas interest was
severed may give notice of abandonment under this subsection. Notice shall
contain the name of the record owner of the interest; a description of the land
and the nature of the interest; the book and page of filing recording of the
interest, if it is filed recorded; the name and address of the person giving
notice; and a statement that the interest is presumed abandoned. The notice
shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the town or towns
where the land affected is located. If the address of the owner of the oil and
gas interest is shown on record, a copy of the notice shall be mailed to that
address by certified or registered mail within 10 days after the date of
publication.
(h) A copy of the notice under subsection (g) of this section, and an
affidavit, may be filed recorded in the land records of the municipality in
which the land is located. The affidavit shall state that the oil or gas interest
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 32 of 39
has been abandoned under the criteria set forth in subsection (b) of this section,
and that notice of abandonment has been given under the criteria set forth in
subsection (g) of this section. After the notice and affidavit have been filed,
unless a court finds to the contrary, the oil and gas interest shall be presumed
abandoned, and the interest of the surface owner shall be presumed for all
purposes free of encumbrance from that interest.
Sec. 43. 30 V.S.A. § 51 is amended to read:
§ 51. RESIDENTIAL BUILDING ENERGY STANDARDS; STRETCH
CODE
* * *
(f) Certification.
(1) Issuance; recording. A certification may be issued by a builder, a
licensed professional engineer, a licensed architect, or an accredited home
energy rating organization. If certification is not issued by a licensed
professional engineer, a licensed architect, or an accredited home energy rating
organization, it shall be issued by the builder. Any certification shall certify
that residential construction meets the RBES. The Department of Public
Service will develop and make available to the public a certificate that lists key
features of the RBES. Any person certifying shall use this certificate or one
substantially like it to certify compliance with the RBES. Certification shall be
issued by completing and signing a certificate and permanently affixing it to
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 33 of 39
the outside of the heating or cooling equipment, to the electrical service panel
located inside the building, or in a visible location in the vicinity of one of
these three areas. The certificate shall certify that the residential building has
been constructed in compliance with the requirements of the RBES. The
person certifying under this subsection shall provide a copy of each certificate
to the Department of Public Service and shall ensure that a certificate is
recorded in the town land records and indexed in the town land records in the
general index. A builder may contract with a licensed professional engineer, a
licensed architect, or an accredited home energy rating organization to issue
certification and to indemnify the builder from any liability to the owner of the
residential construction caused by noncompliance with the RBES.
* * *
(g) Action for damages.
* * *
(2) A person’s failure to affix the certification as required by this section
shall not be an affirmative defense in such an action against the person.
* * *
Sec. 44. 30 V.S.A. § 53 is amended to read:
§ 53. COMMERCIAL BUILDING ENERGY STANDARDS
* * *
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 34 of 39
(c) Revision and interpretation of energy standards. On or before January
1, 2011, the Commissioner shall complete rulemaking to amend the
commercial building energy standards to ensure that commercial building
construction must be designed and constructed in a manner that complies with
ANSI/ASHRAE/IESNA standard 90.1-2007 or the 2009 edition of the IECC,
whichever provides the greatest level of energy savings. The Commissioner of
Public Service shall amend and update the CBES by means of administrative
rules adopted in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25. The Commissioner may
direct the timely and appropriate revision of the CBES after the issuance of
updated standards for commercial construction under the IECC or
ASHRAE/ANSI/IESNA standard 90.1, whichever provides the greatest level
of energy savings. Prior to final adoption of each required revision of the
CBES, the Department of Public Service shall convene an Advisory
Committee to include one or more mortgage lenders; builders; building
designers; architects; civil, mechanical, and electrical engineers; utility
representatives; and other persons with experience and expertise, such as
consumer advocates and energy conservation experts. The Advisory
Committee may provide the Commissioner of Public Service with additional
recommendations for revision of the CBES.
* * *
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 35 of 39
(5) The Commissioner of Public Service may grant written variances or
exemptions from the CBES or rules adopted under this section where strict
compliance would entail practical difficulty or unnecessary hardship, or is
otherwise found unwarranted, provided that:
(A) Any such The variance or exemption shall be consistent with
State energy policy, as specified in section 202a of this title.
(B) Any petitioner for such a variance or exemption can demonstrate
that the methods, means, or practices proposed to be taken in lieu of
compliance with the rule or rules provide, in the opinion of the Commissioner,
equal energy efficiency to that attained by compliance with the rule or rules.
(C) A The petitioner shall submit a copy of any such the variance or
exemption shall be recorded by the petitioner to the municipal clerk for
recording in the land records of the city or town in which the building is
located.
* * *
(d) Certification requirement.
* * *
(4) Provision of a certificate as required by subdivision (1) of this
subsection and of a certificate as required by subdivision (2) of this subsection
shall be conditions precedent to:
* * *
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 36 of 39
(B) issuance by a municipality of a certificate of occupancy for
commercial construction commencing on or after July 1, 2013, if the
municipality requires such a certificate under 24 V.S.A. chapter 117.
* * *
Sec. 45. 32 V.S.A. § 1671 is amended to read:
§ 1671. TOWN CLERK
(a) For the purposes of this section, a “page” is defined as a single side of a
leaf of paper on which is printed, written, or otherwise placed information to
be recorded or filed. The maximum covered area on a page shall be 7 1/2
inches by 14 inches. All letters shall be at least one-sixteenth inch in height or
in at least eight-point type. Unless otherwise provided by law, the fees to town
clerks shall be as follows:
* * *
(2) For filing or recording a copy of a complaint to foreclose a mortgage
as provided in 12 V.S.A. § 4932(b), $15.00 per page.
* * *
(8) For survey plats filed recorded in accordance with 27 V.S.A. chapter
17, a fee of $25.00 per 11 inch by 17 inch 11-inch-by-17-inch sheet, $25.00
per 18 inch by 24 inch 18-inch-by-24-inch sheet, and $25.00 per 24 inch by 36
inch 24-inch-by-36-inch sheet shall be charged.
* * *
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 37 of 39
Sec. 46. 32 V.S.A. § 5255 is amended to read:
§ 5255. REPORT OF SALE; FORM
Within 30 days after such sale of the land, the collector shall make a
complete return of his or her the collector’s doings and file submit the same for
record recording in the land records in the town clerk’s office of the town
wherein such land lies, which return shall be prima facie evidence of the facts
therein stated and shall be substantially in the following form:
By virtue of a warrant (or warrants as the case may be) lawfully committed to
me for the year(s) 20__________ by the treasurer of the town of
__________________ (or by the selectboard of the town of
________________ if the town has voted to collect its taxes by its collector
and the tax bill annexed thereto) and the delinquent tax bill annexed thereto, I
gave notice as required by law to the taxpayers of the town of
________________ of the place where and the time when I would receive such
taxes, and said taxpayers having failed and neglected to pay their said taxes
upon such demand, on the ____ day of ________ 20____, I did extend and
levy my said warrant(s) in the manner provided by law upon the following
described land(s) of the following named delinquent taxpayer situated within
the town, for the following described taxes due thereon, to wit:
Name of Delinquent Taxpayer Description of Land Amount of Tax
And on the ____ day of ________, 20____, I did cause notice of the time and
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 38 of 39
place of sale of the above described land(s) to be published three weeks
successively in ________________ a ________ newspaper circulating in the
town of ______ and vicinity, for the issues of ________, which said notice of
sale therein provided that the same would be holden at __________________,
a public place in the town of __________ at ____ o’clock in the ________
noon, unless said land(s) was previously redeemed by the payment of said tax,
and on the ____day of ________, 20____, I gave the delinquent taxpayer ____
notice by registered mail of the time and place of such sale, and on the same
date posted at ____, a public place in said town, notice of the time and place of
such sale (also here insert facts as to the mortgagee, if any).
And he or she (or they) having failed and neglected to pay said taxes and costs,
at _____________ (place of sale) on the ____ day of ________, 20____ at
____ o’clock in the ________ noon, the time and place set by me for said sale,
pursuant to the notice thereof, I did sell so much of said land(s) as was
necessary to satisfy the tax and costs thereon to
____________________________________ of _____________, for cash in
the sum of __________, he or she being the highest bidder therefor, the land
and premises thus sold being particularly described as follows (here describe
the lands).
From the proceeds of said sale, I did satisfy myself for my own fees and the
legal costs of said sale amounting in the whole to the sum of _____________,
VT LEG #386384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.665
2026 Page 39 of 39
and on the ____ day of ________, 20____, turned over to
______________________________ the treasurer of said town of
__________________, the sum of ________________ in (part) satisfaction of
the taxes due said town on said premises thus sold.
And now at __________________ in said County, this ____ day of ________,
20____, I make return of my doings hereunder by filing the same as herein set
forth with the town clerk of the town of_______________________________
for record as provided by law.
Attest,

_________________________________
Collector of Town Taxes.
Sec. 47. 32 V.S.A. § 5262 is amended to read:
§ 5262. RECORDING LANDS NOT REDEEMED
Within 30 days from the expiration of the time for redemption, the collector
shall deposit submit with the town clerk for record recording in the land
records a list of the lands that have not been redeemed, but a failure to comply
with this provision shall not affect the title of the purchaser.
Sec. 48. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386384 v.1